Hawaii statutes.
§431:1-210 Surety insurance defined.
Surety insurance includes:

(1) Bail bond insurance, which is a guarantee that
any person, in or in connection with any proceedings in any court, will:

(A) Attend in court when required, or

(B) Will obey the orders of judgment of the
court, as a condition to the release of the person from confinement, and the
execution of bail bonds for any such purpose. The making of property or cash
bail does not constitute the transacting of bail bond insurance.

(2) Fidelity insurance, which is insurance
guaranteeing the fidelity of persons holding positions of public or private
trust.

(3) Guaranteeing the performance of contracts and
guaranteeing and executing bonds, undertakings and contracts of suretyship.

(4) Indemnifying banks, bankers, brokers, financial
or moneyed corporations or associations against loss resulting from any cause
of bills of exchange, notes, bonds, securities, evidences of debts, deeds,
mortgages, warehouse receipts, or other valuable papers, documents, money,
precious metals, and articles made therefrom, jewelry, watches, necklaces,
bracelets, gems, precious and semiprecious stones, including any loss while the
same are being transported in armored motor vehicles, or by messenger, but not
including any other risks of transportation or navigation; also against loss or
damage to such insured's premises, or to the insured's furnishings, fixtures,
equipment, safes, and vaults therein, caused by burglary, robbery, theft,
vandalism, or malicious mischief, or any attempted burglary, robbery, theft,
vandalism, or malicious mischief.

(5) Forgery insurance. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next